test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-caacc_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čääʹcc a-stem vesi: # Noun - full paradigm
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čääʹcc
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čääʹʒʒ
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čääʹʒʒ
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čäcca
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čääʹʒʒest
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čaaʹʒʒin
     čääʹcc+N+Ess+Indef: čääʹccen
     čääʹcc+N+Par+Indef: čääʹʒʒed
     čääʹcc+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čääʹʒʒtaa, čääʹʒʒtää]
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čääʹʒʒ
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čaaʹʒʒi
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čaaʹʒʒid
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čaaʹʒʒid
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čaaʹʒʒin
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čaaʹʒʒivuiʹm
     čääʹcc+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čaaʹʒʒitaa, čaaʹʒʒitää]
